Arkansas, session 2025, SB368.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 22-5-804(a), concerning the membership of
the Natural Resources Committee, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The Natural Resources Committee is created and shall be
composed of the following members:
(A) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration or his or her designee;
(B) The Director of Production and Conservation of the Oil
and Gas Commission Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment or
his or her designee;
*CRH103*
03/03/2025 4:19:01 PM CRH103

SB368
(C) The State Geologist;
(D) The Secretary of the Department of Agriculture or his
or her designee;
(E)(D) The Commissioner of State Lands or his or her
designee;
(F)(E) The Executive Secretary of the Arkansas State Game
and Fish Commission or his or her designee;
(G)(F) The Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage,
and Tourism or his or her designee;
(H) The Director of the Division of Environmental Quality;
and
(I)(G) The Chair of the Arkansas Natural Heritage
Commission or his or her designee.
(2) A member of the committee may designate a person within the
member's organization to attend meetings and conduct committee business on
the member's behalf.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 22-5-807(a), concerning notice to and
recommendations from interested agencies related to leases and permits on
state lands related to mineral, timber, and other resources, is amended to
read as follows:
(a) When an application for a lease or permit is filed with the
Commissioner of State Lands for the taking or production of any sand, gravel,
oil, natural gas, casinghead gas, coal, or other minerals or the severance of
any timber or logs from state-owned lands, the Commissioner of State Lands
shall so notify the Office of the State Geologist, the Arkansas Natural
Resources Commission, the Oil and Gas Commission, the Arkansas State Game and
Fish Commission, the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, the Division
of Environmental Quality, the Arkansas Forestry Commission, the Department of
Energy and Environment, and any other appropriate state agency that has or
may have a particular interest in the area proposed to be covered by the
lease or permit.




03/03/2025 4:19:01 PM CRH103